Maryland, session 2025, HB0542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
14–101.
(i) “Law enforcement agency” means a State, county, or municipal police
department, bureau, or agency.
14–102.
(a) It is the policy of the State that adults who lack the physical or mental capacity
to care for their basic daily living needs shall have access to and be provided with needed
professional services sufficient to protect their health, safety, and welfare.
– 1 –

Ch. 500 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–201.
To implement the policy set out in § 14–102 of this title, the Secretary, with the
advice of the Secretary of Health and the Secretary of Aging, shall develop, supervise, and
cause each local department to implement a program of protective services for disabled
individuals and vulnerable adults.
14–301.
The provisions of this subtitle do not limit the responsibility of a law enforcement
agency to enforce the laws of this State or preclude a law enforcement agency from
reporting and investigating alleged criminal conduct.
14–303.
(a) To protect the welfare of the alleged vulnerable adult the local department
shall begin a thorough investigation:
(1) within 5 working days after the receipt of the report of suspected abuse,
neglect, self–neglect, or exploitation; or
(2) within 24 hours after the receipt of the report of suspected abuse,
neglect, self–neglect, or exploitation if the report indicates that an emergency exists.
(b) The investigation shall include:
(1) a determination of whether:
(i) the individual is a vulnerable adult; and
(ii) there has been abuse, neglect, self–neglect, or exploitation; and
(2) if the individual is determined to be a vulnerable adult and to have
suffered abuse, neglect, self–neglect, or exploitation:
(i) a determination of the nature, extent, and cause of the abuse,
neglect, self–neglect, or exploitation;
(ii) a determination of the identity of the person or persons
responsible for the abuse, neglect, self–neglect, or exploitation;
(iii) an evaluation of the home environment; and
(iv) a determination of any other pertinent facts.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 500
(c) (1) On request by the local department, the local State’s Attorney or the
appropriate law enforcement agency shall assist in the investigation.
(2) As appropriate, the local office on aging or the Department of Aging,
local geriatric evaluation service, or any other public or private agency, including a
fiduciary institution, providing services or care to the alleged vulnerable adult or whose
information or expertise may be of assistance in assessing risk or planning services may
assist in the investigation on the request by the local department.
(3) AS APPROPRIATE IN AN INVESTIGATION, THE LOCAL
DEPARTMENT MAY REQUEST THE ASSISTANCE OF A FEDERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER, AS DEFINED IN § 2–104 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
[(3)] (4) Any agencies set out in this subsection may jointly agree to
cooperative arrangements for investigation.
(d) An investigation under this section shall be completed within:
(1) 60 days; or
(2) 10 days if the report indicates that an emergency exists.
(e) Parties participating in an investigation may share pertinent client
information relevant to the investigation.
Article – Human Services
1–201.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person may not disclose
any information concerning an applicant for or recipient of social services, child welfare
services, ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES, cash assistance, food stamps, or medical
assistance that is directly or indirectly derived from the records, investigations, or
communications of the State, a county, or a municipal corporation or a unit of the State, a
county, or a municipal corporation or that is acquired in the course of the performance of
official duties.
(b) This section does not prohibit the disclosure of information:
(1) in accordance with a court order;
(2) to an officer or employee of any state or local government, the United
States, or a fiduciary institution, if the officer or employee is entitled to the information in
an official capacity and the disclosure is necessary to administer:
– 3 –

Ch. 500 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) public assistance, medical assistance, social services, ADULT
PROTECTIVE SERVICES, or child welfare services programs; or
(ii) voter registration in accordance with § 3–203 of the Election Law
Article; or
(3) to a fiduciary institution that reported suspected financial abuse or
financial exploitation, if the fiduciary institution is authorized to request the information
under § 1–306(h) of the Financial Institutions Article.
(c) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 90 days or a fine not exceeding $500 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –